Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1225
License renewal; continuing competency required.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations to establish continuing competency requirements for persons licensed under the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Practice Act. Continuing education is sufficient to meet continuing competency requirements.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 25;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 46;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 267;

Laws 2002, LB 458, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1162.